Washington statutes.
RCW 7.115.901

Construction—Full faith and credit.

The courts of this state shall give full faith and credit as provided for in the United States Constitution to the public acts, records, and judicial proceedings of another state and nothing in chapter 193, Laws of 2023 shall be construed to undermine the primacy of that clause.

[ 2023 c 193 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 193: See note following RCW 7.115.020.